Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.
Sec. 12.55.135.
Sentences of imprisonment for misdemeanors.

A defendant convicted of a class A misdemeanor may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than one year.

A defendant convicted of a class B misdemeanor may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 90 days unless otherwise specified in the provision of law defining the offense.

A defendant convicted of assault in the fourth degree that is a crime involving domestic violence committed in violation of the provisions of an order issued or filed under AS

12.30.027

or AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

and not subject to sentencing under (g) of this section shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 20 days.

A defendant convicted of assault in the fourth degree or harassment in the first degree who knowingly directed the conduct constituting the offense at

a uniformed or otherwise clearly identified peace officer, firefighter, correctional employee, emergency medical technician, paramedic, ambulance attendant, or other emergency responder or medical professional who was engaged in the performance of official duties at the time of the assault or harassment shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of

60 days if the defendant violated AS

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2) or AS

11.61.118

;

30 days if the defendant violated AS

11.41.230(a)(3)

;

a person who was on school grounds during school hours or during a school function or a school-sponsored event, on a school bus, at a school-sponsored event, or in the administrative offices of a school district, if students are educated at that office, shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 60 days if the defendant violated AS

11.41.230(a)(1)

or (2); in this paragraph,

“school bus” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

47.07.063

;

“school grounds” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

If a defendant is sentenced under (c), (d), or (h) of this section,

execution of sentence may not be suspended and probation or parole may not be granted until the minimum term of imprisonment has been served;

imposition of a sentence may not be suspended except upon condition that the defendant be imprisoned for no less than the minimum term of imprisonment provided in the section; and

the minimum term of imprisonment may not otherwise be reduced.

A defendant convicted of vehicle theft in the second degree in violation of AS

11.46.365(a)(1)

shall be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of at least 72 hours but not more than one year.

A defendant convicted of assault in the fourth degree that is a crime involving domestic violence shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of

30 days if the defendant has been previously convicted of a crime against a person or a crime involving domestic violence;

60 days if the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of a crime against a person or a crime involving domestic violence, or a combination of those crimes.

A defendant convicted of failure to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper in the second degree under AS

11.56.840

shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 35 days.

If a defendant is sentenced under (g) of this section,

execution of sentence may not be suspended and probation or parole may not be granted until the minimum term of imprisonment has been served;

imposition of sentence may not be suspended;

the minimum term of imprisonment may not otherwise be reduced.

[Repealed, § 179 ch. 36 SLA 2016.]

In this section,

“crime against a person” means a crime under AS 11.41, or a crime in this or another jurisdiction having elements similar to those of a crime under AS 11.41;

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“medical professional” means a person who is an advanced practice registered nurse, anesthesiologist, chiropractor, dental hygienist, dentist, health aide, nurse, nurse aide, mental health counselor, osteopath, physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychological associate, psychologist, radiologist, surgeon, or x-ray technician, or who holds a substantially similar position.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 1980; am § 22 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 61 SLA 1982; am § 31 ch 143 SLA 1982; am §§ 4, 5 ch 92 SLA 1983; am §§ 5, 6 ch 53 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 71 SLA 1996; am §§ 8, 9 ch 86 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 106 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 53 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2006; am §§ 4, 5 ch 87 SLA 2006; am § 27 ch 33 SLA 2016; am §§ 91 — 93, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 35 — 37 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
75, 76, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “misdemeanors,” “violation” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Classification of offenses — AS

11.81.250

Domestic violence injunctions — AS

25.35.010

, 25.35.020

Arrest authority — AS

12.25.030

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 79-81.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as (g). Relettered in 1998, at which time the cross-reference in subsection (e) was conformed.

Subsections (i) and former (j) [now (k)] were enacted as (h) and (i), respectively.
Relettered in 1998.

Subsection (k) [former (j)] was relettered in 2006.

In 2016, the terms in paragraph (k)(3) were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(u)(4) - (6), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2016 amendments to this section on Rule 32.1, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 180(d), ch. 36, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsections (a), (b), and (l), see sec. 75(b)(5) — (7), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, effective June 3, 2006, added subsection (k) [now (j)].

The second 2006 amendment, effective October 4, 2006, added paragraph (d)(2) and made related changes.

The third 2006 amendment, effective October 4, 2006, inserted “or harassment in the first degree,” “or medical professional,” and “or harassment” in the introductory language of subsection (d), inserted “or AS

11.61.118

” in paragraph (d)(1), and added paragraph (j)(3) [now (k)(3)].

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (k)(3), substituted “advanced practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016 in (a), designated a portion of (a) as (1), added “, if the” at the end of the paragraph, added (a)(1)(A) - (D) and (a)(2); in (b), designated a portion of (a) as (1), in (a)(1), substituted “10 days” for “90 days”, added “or in this section” at the end, added (a)(2); repealed (j); added (

l

) - (p).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (a)(1)(E)(iv), and made related changes; added (b)(3) and made related changes; in (

l

)(1) at the beginning, substituted “more than 15 days of active imprisonment” for “more than five days of suspended imprisonment” and deleted “or more” following “been convicted two”, and made a related change; in (

l

)(2), substituted “a sentence of more than 10 days of active imprisonment and a term of probation of more than six months if the person has previously” for “a sentence of active or suspended imprisonment if the person has not been previously convicted, or has previously”, and made related changes; added (

l

)(3).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a) and (b), which read, “(a) A defendant convicted of a class A misdemeanor may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than

“(1) one year, if the

“(A) conviction is for a crime with a mandatory minimum term of 30 days or more of active imprisonment;

“(B) trier of fact finds the aggravating factor that the conduct constituting the offense was among the most serious conduct included in the definition of the offense;

“(C) defendant has past criminal convictions for conduct violative of criminal laws, punishable as felonies or misdemeanors, similar in nature to the offense for which the defendant is being sentenced;

“(D) conviction is for an assault in the fourth degree under AS

11.41.230

; or

“(E) conviction is for a violation of

“(i) AS

11.41.427

;

“(ii) AS

11.41.440

;

“(iii) AS

11.41.460

, if the indecent exposure is before a person under 16 years of age;

“(iv) AS

11.61.116(c)(2)

; or

“(v) AS

11.61.118(a)(2)

; or

“(2) 30 days.

“(b) A defendant convicted of a class B misdemeanor may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than

“(1) 10 days unless otherwise specified in the provision of law defining the offense or in this section;

“(2) 90 days if the conviction is for a violation of

“(A) AS

11.61.116(c)(1)

and the person is 21 years of age or older; or

“(B) AS

11.61.120(a)(6)

and the person is 21 years of age or older; or

“(3) five days if the conviction is for a violation of AS

11.56.757

.”; and repealed (

l

), (m), (n), (o) and (p).

Editor's notes. —

Section 22(c),
ch. 86, SLA 1998 provides that with respect to the 1998 enactment of subsections (g), (i), and former (j), “[r]eferences to previous convictions in this Act apply to all convictions occurring before, on, or after June 13, 1998.”

Section 142(b), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.55.137.
Penalties for gang activities punishable as misdemeanors.

If a person commits an offense that would be a class B misdemeanor and the person committed the offense for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang, the offense is a class A misdemeanor.

If a person commits an offense that would be a class A misdemeanor and the person committed the offense for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang, the offense is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 60 SLA 1996)

Sec. 12.55.139.
Penalties for criminal nonsupport and aiding nonpayment of child support.

In addition to other penalties imposed for the offense of criminal nonsupport under AS

11.51.120

, the court may suspend, restrict, or revoke, for the period during which the arrearage continues to exist, a recreational license as defined in AS

09.50.020(c)

, if the defendant is a natural person.

In addition to other penalties imposed for the offense of aiding the nonpayment of child support in the first degree under AS

11.51.121

and for the offense of aiding the nonpayment of child support in the second degree under AS

11.51.122

, the court may suspend, restrict, or revoke, for a period not to exceed one year, a recreational license as defined in AS

09.50.020(c)

, if the defendant is a natural person.

History.

(§ 5 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 9, 10 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “for the period during which the arrearage continues to exist” for “for a period not to exceed six months” in subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

Sec. 12.55.140.
Sentences for violations. [Repealed, § 23 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 12.55.145.
Prior convictions.

For purposes of considering prior convictions in imposing sentence under

AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d), or (e),

a prior conviction may not be considered if a period of 10 or more years has elapsed between the date of the defendant’s unconditional discharge on the immediately preceding offense and commission of the present offense unless the prior conviction was for an unclassified or class A felony;

a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a felony defined as such under Alaska law at the time the offense was committed is considered a prior felony conviction;

two or more convictions arising out of a single, continuous criminal episode during which there was no substantial change in the nature of the criminal objective are considered a single conviction unless the defendant was sentenced to consecutive sentences for the crimes; offenses committed while attempting to escape or avoid detection or apprehension after the commission of another offense are not part of the same criminal episode or objective;

AS

12.55.125(l)

,

a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a most serious felony is considered a prior most serious felony conviction;

commission of and conviction for offenses relied on as prior most serious felony offenses must occur in the following order: conviction for the first offense must occur before commission of the second offense, and conviction for the second offense must occur before commission of the offense for which the defendant is being sentenced;

AS

12.55.135(g)

,

a prior conviction may not be considered if a period of five or more years has elapsed between the date of the defendant’s unconditional discharge on the immediately preceding offense and commission of the present offense unless the prior conviction was for an unclassified or class A felony;

a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a crime against a person or a crime involving domestic violence is considered a prior conviction;

two or more convictions arising out of a single, continuous criminal episode during which there was no substantial change in the nature of the criminal objective are considered a single conviction unless the defendant was sentenced to consecutive sentences for the crimes; offenses committed while attempting to escape or avoid detection or apprehension after the commission of another offense are not part of the same criminal episode or objective;

AS

12.55.125(i)

,

a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a sexual felony is a prior conviction for a sexual felony;

a felony conviction in another jurisdiction making it a crime to commit any lewd and lascivious act on a child under the age of 16 years, with the intent of arousing, appealing to, or gratifying the sexual desires of the defendant or the victim is a prior conviction for a sexual felony;

two or more convictions arising out of a single, continuous criminal episode during which there was no substantial change in the nature of the criminal objective are considered a single conviction unless the defendant was sentenced to consecutive sentences for the crimes; offenses committed while attempting to escape or avoid detection or apprehension after the commission of another offense are not part of the same criminal episode or objective;

a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a felony defined as such under Alaska law at the time the offense was committed is considered a prior felony conviction.

When sentence is imposed under this chapter, prior convictions not expressly admitted by the defendant must be proved by authenticated copies of court records served on the defendant or the defendant’s counsel at least 20 days before the date set for imposition of sentence.

The defendant shall file with the court and serve on the prosecuting attorney notice of denial, consisting of a concise statement of the grounds relied upon and that may be supported by affidavit or other documentary evidence, no later than 10 days before the date set for the imposition of sentence if the defendant

denies

the authenticity of a prior judgment of conviction;

that the defendant is the person named in the judgment;

that the elements of a prior offense committed in this or another jurisdiction are similar to those of a

felony defined as such under Alaska law;

most serious felony, defined as such under Alaska law;

crime against a person or a crime involving domestic violence;

that a prior conviction occurred within the period specified in (a)(1)(A) or (3)(A) of this section; or

that a previous conviction occurred in the order required under (a)(2)(B) of this section; or

alleges that two or more purportedly separate prior convictions should be considered a single conviction under (a)(1)(C) or (3)(C) of this section.

Matters alleged in a notice of denial shall be heard by the court sitting without a jury. If the defendant introduces substantial evidence that the defendant is not the person named in a prior judgment of conviction, that the judgment is not authentic, that the conviction did not occur within the period specified in (a)(1)(A) or (3)(A) of this section, that a conviction should not be considered a prior felony conviction under (a)(1)(B) of this section, a prior most serious felony conviction under (a)(2)(A) of this section, or a prior crime against a person or a crime involving domestic violence conviction under (a)(3)(B) of this section, or that a previous conviction did not occur in the order required under (a)(2)(B) of this section, then the burden is on the state to prove the contrary beyond a reasonable doubt. The burden of proof that two or more convictions should be considered a single conviction under (a)(1)(C) or (3)(C) of this section is on the defendant by clear and convincing evidence.

The authenticated judgments of courts of record of the United States, the District of Columbia, or of any state, territory, or political subdivision of the United States are prima facie evidence of conviction.

Under this section, a prior conviction has occurred when a defendant has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or when a verdict of guilty or guilty but mentally ill has been returned by a jury or by the court.

In this section,

“crime against a person” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.135

;

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 143 SLA 1982; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 7 SLA 1996; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 90 SLA 2003; am § 15 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 38 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 77 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “unconditional discharge” — AS

12.55.185

Sentences of imprisonment for felonies — AS

12.55.125

Escape — AS

11.56.300

—

11.56.330

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor's notes. —

Section 35, ch. 143, SLA 1982 enacted a subsection (f) which was renumbered in 1982 as AS

12.55.147

.

The reference to “AS

12.55.135(j)

” in paragraph (g)(1) was substituted for “AS

12.55.135(i)

” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 relettering of that subsection.

The reference to “AS

12.55.135

” in paragraph (g)(1) was substituted for “AS

12.55.135(j)

” in 2006 to reflect the relettering in that section.

Cross references. —

For effect of convictions prior to January 1, 1980 (effective date of ch. 166, SLA 1978), see § 23, ch. 166, SLA 1978, in the Temporary and Special Acts; section 19, ch. 7, SLA 1996 provides that references in that Act, which amended subsections (a), (c), and (d) and added subsection (f), to prior or previous convictions apply “to all convictions occurring before, on, or after June 27, 1996”.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(b)(8), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent regarding the 2019 amendment to (a) of this section, see § 1, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a)(4)(B), substituted “act on a child” for “act upon a child,” added (a)(4)(D), and deleted (a)(5), which read, “(5) AS

12.55.135(a)

,

“(A) a prior conviction may not be considered if a period of five or more years has elapsed between the date of the defendant’s unconditional discharge on the immediately preceding offense and commission of the present offense unless the prior conviction was for an unclassified or class A felony;

“(B) a conviction in this or another jurisdiction of an offense having elements similar to those of a felony or misdemeanor defined as such under Alaska law at the time the offense was committed is considered a prior conviction;

“(C) two or more convictions arising out of a single, continuous criminal episode during which there was no substantial change in the nature of the criminal objective are considered a single conviction unless the defendant was sentenced to consecutive sentences for the crimes; offenses committed while attempting to escape or avoid detection or apprehension after the commission of another offense are not part of the same criminal episode or objective.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(b), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (a) of this section applies “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.55.147.
Fingerprints at time of sentencing.

When a defendant is convicted of a felony by a court of this state, the defendant’s fingerprints shall be placed on the judgment of conviction in open court, on the record, at the time of sentencing.
The defendant and the person administering the fingerprinting shall sign their names under the fingerprints.

History.

(§ 35 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

12.55.145(f)

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 12.55.148.
Judgment for sex offenses or child kidnappings.

When a defendant is convicted of a sex offense or child kidnapping by a court of this state, the written judgment must set out the requirements of AS

12.63.010

and, if it can be determined by the court, whether that conviction will require the offender or kidnapper to register for life or a lesser period under AS 12.63.

In this section, “sex offense” and “child kidnapping” have the meanings given in AS

12.63.100

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.55.151.
Court may not reduce or mitigate punishment based on victim’s failure to appear or testify.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, when sentencing a defendant, a court may not mitigate or reduce the punishment of the defendant based on, or otherwise consider as a mitigating factor or reason to impose a lesser punishment, the failure of the crime victim to appear or testify.

History.

(§ 13 ch 92 SLA 2001)